en: Potted plants
de: Pflanzen im Topf
es: Plantas en maceta
fi: ruukkukasvit
fr: Plantes en pot
hr: Lončanice
lt: Vazoniniai augalai
nl: Planten in pot
pt: Plantas em vaso

en: Potted aromatic plants
de: Gewürzpflanzen im Topf
es: Macetas de plantas aromáticas, Plantas aromáticas en maceta
fr: Plantes aromatiques en pot
hr: Aromatične biljke u posudama
lt: Aromatiniai vazoniniai augalai
nl: Aromatische planten in pot
pt: Plantas aromáticas em vaso

en: Herbs, Aromatic herbs, Fresh herbs
bg: Ароматични пресни подправки
ca: Herbes aromàtiques
da: Urter, Aromatiske urter, Friske urter
de: Kräuter
es: Hierbas aromáticas
fi: mausteyrtit, vihreitä kasvinosia mausteita
fr: Herbes aromatiques, Herbes aromatiques fraîches
hr: Bilje
it: Erbe aromatiche
ja: ハーブ
lt: Aromatinės žolelės
nl: Kruiden
pt: Ervas aromáticas
ru: Травы
sv: Örter, Aromatiska örter, Färska örter
zh: 香草

en: Mary thistle, Milk thistle, Silybum marianum
cs: Ostropestřec mariánský
de: Mariendistel
fr: Chardon-Marie
hr: Mary thistle
la: Silybum marianum
pl: Ostropest plamisty

en: Basils, Basil, Thai basil, Sweet basil
bg: Босилек
da: Basilikummer, Basilikum
de: Basilikum
es: Albahaca, Alhábega
fi: basilika
fr: Basilic
hr: Bosiljak
it: Basilico
ja: バジル, バジリコ
la: Ocimum basilicum
lt: Bazilikas
nl: Basilicums
pl: Bazylia
sv: Basilikor, Basilika

en: Fresh basils, Fresh basil
da: Friske basilikummer
de: frisches Basilikum
es: Albahaca fresca
fr: Basilic frais
hr: Svježi bosiljak
lt: Šviežias bazilikas
nl: Verse basilicums
pl: Bazylia świeża
sv: Färska basilikor

en: Genovese basils
da: Genovesiske basilikummer
es: Albahaca genovesa
it: Basilico Genovese
ja: ジェノベーゼバジル
la: Ocimum basilicum ‘Genovese’
sv: Genovesiska basilikor

en: Frozen basils, Frozen basil
da: Frosne basilikummer
de: gefrorenes Basilikum
es: Albahaca congelada
fr: Basilic surgelé
hr: Smrznuti bosiljak
it: Basilico surgelato
lt: Šadytas bazilikas
nl: Bevroren basilicums
sv: Frysta basilikor

en: Ground dried basils, Ground dried basil
da: Malede tørrede basilikummer
de: trocken gemahlenes Basilikum
es: Albahaca seca molida
fr: Basilic séché moulu, basilic sec moulu
hr: Samljeveni suhi bosiljak
lt: Maltas džiovintas bazilikas
nl: Gedroogde gemalen basilicums
sv: Malna torkade basilikor

en: Dried basils, Dried basil
da: Tørrede basilikummer
de: Getrockneter Basilikum
fr: Basilic séché
hr: Sušeni bosiljak
lt: Džiovintas bazilikas
sv: Torkade basilikor

en: Potted basils, Potted basil
da: Basilikummer i krukke
de: Basilikum im Topf
es: Macetas de albahaca, Albahaca en maceta
fr: Basilic en pot
hr: Bosiljak u saksiji
lt: Bazilikas vazonėlyje
nl: Basilicums in pot
sv: Basilikor i kruka

en: Chives, Chive
af: sprietui
am: ቀጭን ሽንኩርት
ar: ثوم معمر
az: mala soğanı
be: цыбуля скарада
bg: Див лук
bo: ཀེའུ།
bs: vlasac
ca: cibulet
cs: pažitka, pažitka pobřežní
cy: cenhinen syfi
da: purløg
de: Schnittlauch
el: πρασουλίδα, σχοινόπρασο, άλλιον το σχοινόπρασον
eo: ŝenoprazo
es: Cebollino, cebollinos
et: murulauk
eu: tipulin
fa: پیاز کوهی
fi: Ruohosipulit, ruohosipuli, ruohosipulia, käärmeenlaukka
fr: Ciboulette, Civette
ga: síobhas
gl: ceboliño
gv: shoushan
he: שום העירית
hr: vlasac
ht: siv
hu: metélőhagyma
id: lokio
is: graslaukur
it: cippolina, aglio d'india
ja: チャイブ
jv: lokio
kk: шалғын жуа, şalğın jwa, شالعىن جۋا
ko: 차이브
la: Allium schoenoprasum
lb: bratzel
li: bieslouk
lt: Laiškinis česnakas, laiškiniai česnakai
lv: maurloks, maurloki
mk: власец
ml: ചൈവ്സ്
nb: grasløk
nl: bieslook
nn: graslauk
oc: ceboleta
pl: szczypior, czosnek szczypiorek, szczypiorek
pt: cebolinho
ro: arpagic
ru: лук скорода
sk: pažítka
sl: drobnjak
sv: gräslök
ta: இனப்பூண்டு
tr: yaprak soğanı
uk: цибуля-різанець
ur: ثوم معمر
vi: hành tăm
wa: brele
zh: 蝦夷蔥

en: Fresh chives
de: frischer Schnittlauch
es: Cebollino fresco
fr: Ciboulette fraîche
hr: Svježi vlasac
lt: Šviežias laiškinis česnakas
nl: Verse lenteui

en: Frozen chives
de: gefrorener Schnittlauch
es: Cebollino congelado
fr: Ciboulette surgelé, Ciboulettes surgelées
hr: Smrznuti vlasac
lt: Šaldytas laiškinis česnakas
nl: Bevroren biesloken

en: Ground dried chives
de: trocken gemahlener Schnittlauch
es: Cebollino seco molido
fr: Ciboulette sèche moulue
hr: Samljeveni suhi vlasac
lt: Džiovintas maltas laiškinis česnakas
nl: Gemalen gedroogde biesloken

en: Dried Chives
fr: Ciboulette séchée

en: Lyophilized Chives, Freeze-dried Chives
de: gefriergetrockneter Schnittlauch
es: Cebollino liofilizado
fr: Ciboulette lyophilisée
hr: Liofilizirani vlasac
lt: Šalčiu džiovintas laiškinis česnakas
nl: Gevriesdroogde biesloken

en: Potted chives
de: Schnittlauch im Topf
es: Macetas de cebollino, Cebollino en maceta
fr: Ciboulette en pot
hr: Vlasac u loncima
lt: Laiškinis česnakas vazonėlyje
nl: Biesloken in pot

en: Coriander products, Coriander, Cilantro, Chinese parsley, Dhania
da: Korianderprodukter, Koriander
de: Koriander
es: Productos del cilantro, Cilantro, Coriandro
fi: Korianterituotteet, Korianteri
fr: Produits de coriandre, Coriandre, Coriandre cultivée
hr: Proizvodi od korijandera
ja: コリアンダー
la: Coriandrum sativum
lt: Kalendros produktai, kalendra
nb: Korianderprodukt, Korianderprodukter, Koriander
nl: Korianders
nn: Korianderprodukt, Koriander
sv: Korianderprodukter, Koriander

en: Coriander leaves, Cilantro leaves
da: Korianderblade
de: Korianderblätter
es: Hojas de cilantro, Hojas de coriandro
fi: Korianterin lehdet
fr: Feuilles de coriandre
hr: Listovi korijandera
lt: Kalendros lapai
nb: Korianderblad
nl: Korianderbladeren
nn: Korianderblad
pl: Liście kolendry
sv: Korianderblad